Utah statutes.
78B-3-419.   Evidence of proceedings not admissible in subsequent action -- Panelist may not be compelled to testify -- Immunity of panelist from civil liability -- Information regarding professional conduct.

(1)  Evidence of the proceedings conducted by the medical review panel and its results, opinions, findings, and determinations are not admissible as evidence in any civil action or arbitration proceeding subsequently brought by the claimant against any respondent and are not reportable to any health care facility or health care insurance carrier as a part of any credentialing process.

(2)  No panelist may be compelled to testify in a civil action subsequently filed with regard to the subject matter of the panel's review.  A panelist has immunity from civil liability arising from participation as a panelist and for all communications, findings, opinions, and conclusions made in the course and scope of duties prescribed by this section.

(3)  Nothing in this chapter may be interpreted to prohibit the division from considering any information contained in a statutory notice of intent to commence action, request for prelitigation panel review, or written findings of a panel with respect to the division's determining whether a licensee engaged in unprofessional or unlawful conduct.



Amended by Chapter 275, 2013 General Session

